lexc/noun/enhumelyjaje.lexc
!!!enhuoa.lexc!!!

Multichar_Symbols  +Noun[gcat] +Pref+

+Dis +Ess +Soc +Tem 
+Posss1s +Posss2s +Posss3s +Possp1s +Possp2s +Possp3s 
+Posss1p +Posss2p +Posss3p +Possp1p +Possp2p +Possp3p

+Plur +Fam +Gens +Genpl
      
+Abl +Acc[lfea] +Ade +All +Cau +Dat +Del
+Ela +Fac +For +Forp +Forpen +Ill +Ine +Ins +Nom
+Sub +Sup +Ter
      
§VV§ §uue2§ §AE21§
§UUE2§ §OEOE25§ §UUE21§ §AE22§ §OEOE22§ §oooe2§ §oeoez22§
§AAA2§ §oeoe2§ §AA2§ §oeoez25§ §JJ§ §b§ §h§ §k§ §n§ §r§ §t§ §oeoez17§
§OEOE17§ §EOA17§ §ooez18§
      
LEXICON Root
Prefnum;
Noun ;


LEXICON Prefnum
+Pref+:sok       Noun2; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:több       Noun2; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:fél       Noun2; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:másod       Noun2; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:harmad       Noun2; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:negyed       Noun2; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:ötöd       Noun2; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:hatod       Noun2; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:heted       Noun2; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:nyolcad       Noun2; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:kilenced       Noun2; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:tized       Noun2; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:huszad       Noun2; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:harmincad       Noun2; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:negyvened       Noun2; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:ötvened       Noun2; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:hetvened       Noun2; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:század       Noun2; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:ezred       Noun2; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:egy       Noun2; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:két       Noun2; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:három       Noun2; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:négy       Noun2; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:öt       Noun2; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:hat       Noun2; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:hét       Noun2; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:nyolc       Noun2; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:kilenc       Noun2; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:tíz       Noun2; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:tizenegy       Noun2; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:tizenkét       Noun2; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:tizenhárom       Noun2; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:tizennégy       Noun2; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:tizenöt       Noun2; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:tizenhat       Noun2; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:tizenhét       Noun2; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:tizennyolc       Noun2; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:tizenkilenc       Noun2; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:húsz       Noun2; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:harminc       Noun2; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:negyven       Noun2; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:ötven       Noun2; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:hatvan       Noun2; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:hetven       Noun2; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:nyolcvan       Noun2; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:kilencven       Noun2; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:száz       Noun2; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:ezer       Noun2; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:millió       Noun2; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:milliárd       Noun2; ! optional article prefix
                        Noun2; ! empty string entry

LEXICON Noun2
annyi AddNounannyi;
dombi AddNoun;
fikarcnyi AddNoun;
kori AddNoun1;
kétannyi AddNounannyi;
laki AddNoun1;
lábnyi AddNoun;
magnitúdónyi AddNoun;
napi AddNoun1;
nyári AddNoun1;
oldali AddNoun1;
pári AddNoun;
szögacél AddNoun;
szögprofil AddNoun;
szögtani AddNoun1;
ágnyi AddNoun;
órai AddNoun1;



!define Cons [b | c | d | f | g | h | j | k | l | m | n | p | q | r | s | t | v | w | x | y | z];
!define Vowel [a | á | e | é | i | í | o | ó | u | ú | ü | ű | ö | ő];
!define Root [ [Cons^{0,4} Vowel^{1,3}] | [Cons^{0,4} Vowel^{1,3} Cons^{1,4} Vowel^{0,3} ]* ] ;

LEXICON AddNoun
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Poss;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Plur;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Fam;

LEXICON Poss
+Dis:^+cDis^§ooez18§nként     #;    ! anként, enként
+Soc:^+cSoc^§EOA17§st§uue2§l  #;    ! astul, estül
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or               #;    ! kor
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE17§m   Fam;   ! m
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE17§d   Fam;   ! d
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§JJ§§AE21§   Fam;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp1s:^+cPossp1s^§UUE2§nk   Fam;    ! unk, ünk
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE17§t§OEOE25§k   Fam;   ! etek, atok
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§JJ§§UUE21§k   Fam;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JJ§§AE22§im   Fam;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JJ§§AE22§id   Fam;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JJ§§AE22§i   Fam;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JJ§§AE22§ink   Fam;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JJ§§AE22§it§OEOE22§k   Fam;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JJ§§AE22§ik   Fam;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
                           Fam;

LEXICON Plur
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez17§k    Gen;
                            Gen;
        
LEXICON Fam
+Fam:^+cFam^ék         Gen;
                       Gen;

LEXICON Gen
+Gens:^+cGens^é        Case;
+Genpl:^+cGenpl^éi     Case;
                       Case;
 
LEXICON Case
+Abl:^+cAbl^§t§§oooe2§l     #;  ! tól, től
+Acc[lfea]:^+cAcc^§oeoez22§t    #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Ade:^+cAde^§n§§AAA2§l      #;  ! nál, nél
+All:^+cAll^§h§§oeoe2§z     #;  ! hoz, hez, höz
+Cau:^+cCau^ért           #;  ! ért
+Dat:^+cDat^§n§§AA2§k       #;  ! nak, nek
+Del:^+cDel^§r§§oooe2§l     #;  ! ról, ről
+Ess:^+cEss^§uue2§l          #;    ! ul, ül
+Ela:^+cEla^§b§§oooe2§l     #;  ! ból, ből
+Fac:^+cFac^§VV§§AAA2§    #;  ! vá, vé
+Forp:^+ccForp^§k§épp          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Forpen:^+cxForpen^§k§éppen          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+For:^+cFor^§k§ént          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Ill:^+cIll^§b§§AA2§        #;  ! ba, be
+Ine:^+cIne^§b§§AA2§n       #;  ! ban, ben
+Ins:^+cIns^§VV§§AA2§l    #;  ! val, vel
+Nom:^+cNom^0             #;  ! 
+Sub:^+cSub^§r§§AA2§        #;  ! ra, re
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoez25§n    #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Ter:^+cTer^ig            #;  ! ig
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or #; ! kor

LEXICON AddNoun1
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Poss1;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Fam1;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Plur1;

LEXICON Poss1
+Dis:^+cDis^§ooez18§nként     #;    ! anként, enként
+Soc:^+cSoc^§EOA17§st§uue2§l  #;    ! astul, estül
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or               #;    ! kor
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE17§m   Fam1;   ! m
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE17§d   Fam1;   ! d
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§JJ§§AE21§   Fam1;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp1s:^+cPossp1s^§UUE2§nk   Fam1;    ! unk, ünk
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE17§t§OEOE25§k   Fam1;   ! etek, atok
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§JJ§§UUE21§k   Fam1;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JJ§§AE22§im   Fam1;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JJ§§AE22§id   Fam1;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JJ§§AE22§i   Fam1;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JJ§§AE22§ink   Fam1;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JJ§§AE22§it§OEOE22§k   Fam1;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JJ§§AE22§ik   Fam1;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
                           Fam1;
        
LEXICON Plur1
+Plur:^+cPlur^ak    Gen1;
+Plur:^+cPlur^ak    Case1;

LEXICON Fam1
+Fam:^+cFam^ék         Gen1;
                       Gen1;

LEXICON Gen1
+Gens:^+cGens^é        Case1;
+Genpl:^+cGenpl^éi     Case1;
                       Case1;
 

LEXICON Noun
Kamill AddNoun;
Rotring AddNoun;
acélpáncél AddNoun;
agyagsztalagmit AddNoun;
ajándékforgalmi AddNoun1;
alamuszi AddNoun1;
alappoén AddNoun;
alegységbizalmi AddNoun1;
alkalmazotti AddNoun1;
alkonyi AddNoun1;
alpári AddNoun1;
alvókabin AddNoun;
amerikai AddNoun1;
antalli AddNoun1;
anyai AddNoun1;
anyanyuszi AddNoun;
aral-tói AddNoun1;
aranysír AddNoun;
artistai AddNoun1;
atlétikai AddNoun1;
autóbuszprofil AddNoun;
aznapi AddNoun1;
babapofi AddNoun;
babitsi AddNoun1;
balzaci AddNoun1;
bandériumtartási AddNoun;
bazaltsíp AddNoun;
beszari AddNoun1;
betöltőrutin AddNoun;
bioorvosi AddNoun1;
bizományi AddNoun1;
bocipuszi AddNoun;
bonctani AddNoun1;
borotvapír AddNoun;
bronzpáncél AddNoun;
bunyóbalett AddNoun;
burgundi AddNoun1;
bányagyakorlati AddNoun1;
bányászmártír AddNoun;
béléspapír AddNoun;
bújósdi AddNoun;
büntetőjogi AddNoun1;
casanovai AddNoun1;
cellulózpapír AddNoun;
ciprusi AddNoun1;
ciánkáli AddNoun;
csatlakozásnapi AddNoun1;
csecsemősír AddNoun;
csillagprofil AddNoun;
csodaparti AddNoun;
csomóponti AddNoun1;
csontpáncél AddNoun;
csúcskombi AddNoun;
célbaci AddNoun;
dantei AddNoun1;
detroiti AddNoun1;
devizaforint AddNoun;
dny.-i AddNoun1;
dohányalkaloid AddNoun;
dublini AddNoun1;
duci AddNoun;
dunakanyari AddNoun1;
délszaki AddNoun1;
díszpóni AddNoun;
egyenruházati AddNoun1;
egészségkoktél AddNoun;
eidami AddNoun1;
elektori AddNoun1;
elíziumi AddNoun1;
emberkugli AddNoun;
ementáli AddNoun1;
es-Salaam-i AddNoun1;
esszenciavámpír AddNoun;
euroatlanti AddNoun1;
ezópusi AddNoun1;
facsoki AddNoun;
fali AddNoun1;
fapoén AddNoun;
farizeusi AddNoun1;
fejelőfoci AddNoun;
festőparti AddNoun;
fiatalkori AddNoun1;
fiziológiai AddNoun1;
flamingókrokett AddNoun;
fogalmi AddNoun1;
folyamataudit AddNoun;
folyóparti AddNoun1;
formai AddNoun1;
fotóspasi AddNoun;
frenológiai AddNoun1;
fuvolasíp AddNoun;
félnapi AddNoun1;
fémcsiszolópapír AddNoun;
férfibutik AddNoun;
földalatti AddNoun1;
függönylufi AddNoun;
főiskolai AddNoun1;
főpoén AddNoun;
gatyáskuvik AddNoun;
gazdasági AddNoun1;
golyótányér AddNoun;
gondolati AddNoun1;
gumifásli AddNoun;
gyepkugli AddNoun;
gyorsnudli AddNoun;
gyámi AddNoun1;
gálaparti AddNoun;
gödörsír AddNoun;
habsburgi AddNoun1;
hajógurtni AddNoun;
hallási AddNoun1;
hami AddNoun;
harántsíp AddNoun;
hatósági AddNoun1;
helyrajzi AddNoun1;
heroinpakett AddNoun;
hoffmanni AddNoun1;
holding AddNoun;
honi AddNoun1;
horizontprofil AddNoun;
hálókocsi AddNoun;
házassági AddNoun1;
hódgallér AddNoun;
húsvéti AddNoun1;
hőssír AddNoun;
időskori AddNoun1;
ingatlancél AddNoun;
ipari AddNoun1;
iskolásdi AddNoun;
jelenkori AddNoun1;
jelzőcél AddNoun;
járomcsonti AddNoun1;
játéknyuszi AddNoun;
kabalazokni AddNoun;
karamellpuding AddNoun;
kari AddNoun1;
kenőzsír AddNoun;
kibernetikai AddNoun1;
kiváltóprofil AddNoun;
kollégiumi AddNoun1;
komputerkoktél AddNoun;
kortársi AddNoun1;
kriptasír AddNoun;
kuruckori AddNoun1;
kutyasír AddNoun;
köcsögbuzi AddNoun;
körforgalmi AddNoun1;
középkori AddNoun1;
kőbuzi AddNoun;
lakodalmi AddNoun1;
levelezéscél AddNoun;
lipicai AddNoun1;
lábszárpáncél AddNoun;
látnoki AddNoun1;
macskabóvli AddNoun;
majakovszkiji AddNoun1;
maróni AddNoun;
mennyiségtani AddNoun1;
menürutin AddNoun;
mindenkori AddNoun1;
mondatcucli AddNoun;
mostani AddNoun1;
murvagallér AddNoun;
módi AddNoun1;
mókuscsoki AddNoun;
napfogyatkozási AddNoun1;
niggerbuzi AddNoun;
nyelvtani AddNoun1;
nyárspolgári AddNoun1;
nyúlfing AddNoun;
nőági AddNoun1;
oldallufi AddNoun;
onyega-tói AddNoun1;
orvostudományi AddNoun1;
palaparti AddNoun;
papi AddNoun1;
pasi AddNoun;
pedagógiai AddNoun1;
plasztikruci AddNoun;
postai AddNoun1;
posztheroin AddNoun;
prófétasír AddNoun;
pálpusztai AddNoun1;
pártbizalmi AddNoun1;
pártprofil AddNoun;
receptpapír AddNoun;
renoiri AddNoun1;
reteszpáncél AddNoun;
rubiki AddNoun1;
rumli AddNoun;
sajtlobbi AddNoun;
sasúti AddNoun1;
slusszpoén AddNoun;
sráchaver AddNoun;
statisztikai AddNoun1;
szalagpáncél AddNoun;
szarházi AddNoun1;
szerelőbácsi AddNoun;
szilárdsági AddNoun1;
szoci AddNoun;
szolgai AddNoun1;
szájtáti AddNoun1;
szégyenpír AddNoun;
szőrmesapi AddNoun;
tafotazsír AddNoun;
tanganyika-tói AddNoun1;
tartózkodási AddNoun1;
technológiaprofil AddNoun;
tel-avivi AddNoun1;
tereppaci AddNoun;
tinédzserparti AddNoun;
tiszaháti AddNoun1;
transzatlanti AddNoun1;
trónkárpit AddNoun;
táji AddNoun1;
távirati AddNoun1;
távpuszi AddNoun;
tömbbizalmi AddNoun1;
törpenyuszi AddNoun;
utcabizalmi AddNoun1;
vadcsacsi AddNoun;
vallási AddNoun1;
veremsír AddNoun;
világi AddNoun1;
virággyógyír AddNoun;
vállalkozásjogi AddNoun1;
vásármagazin AddNoun;
zafír AddNoun;
zsarnoki AddNoun1;
zöldfoki AddNoun;
állati AddNoun1;
áruszortiment AddNoun;
életrajzi AddNoun1;
észak-oszétiai AddNoun1;
észlelőparti AddNoun;
írnoki AddNoun1;
ókori AddNoun1;
örökléstani AddNoun1;
újnáci AddNoun;
úszási AddNoun1;
őskori AddNoun1;
ősmaki AddNoun;
